en: Wines from South Africa, South African Wines
fr: Vins d'Afrique du Sud
hr: Vina iz južne afrike
nl: Zuidafrikaanse wijnen, Zuid-Afrikaanse wijnen

en: Serbian wines
hu: Szerb borok

en: Slovakian wines
hu: Szlovák borok

en: British wines
hu: Brit borok

en: Swiss wines
de: Schweizer Weine
fr: Vins suisses
hr: Švicarska vina
hu: Svájci borok
nl: Zwitserse wijnen

en: Wines from Austria, Austrian Wines
de: Weine aus Österreich, österreichische Weine
es: Vinos de Austria
fr: Vins d'Autriche
hr: Vina iz austrije
hu: Osztrák borok
it: Vini austriaci
nl: Oostenrijkse wijnen

en: Wines from Brazil, Brazilian Wines
de: Weine aus Brasilien
es: Vinos de Brasil, Vinos brasileños
fr: Vins du Brésil, vins brésiliens
hr: Vina iz brazila
hu: Brazil borok
it: Vini del Brasile, Vini brasiliani
nl: Braziliaanse wijnen, Braziliaanse wijn, Wijn uit Brazilië
pt: Vinhos do Brasil, Vinhos brasileiros

en: Danish wines
da: Danske vine
de: Dänische Weine
fr: Vins danois
hr: Danska vina
hu: Dán borok

en: Dutch wines
de: Niederländische Weine
fr: Vins néerlandais
hr: Nizozemska vina
hu: Holland borok
nl: Nederlandse wijnen, Wijnen uit Nederland

en: Wines from Belgium, Belgian Wines
de: Belgische Weine
es: Vinos belgas
fr: Vins belges
hr: Vina iz belgije
hu: Belga borok
nl: Belgische wijnen

en: Wines from Bulgaria, Bulgarian Wines
de: Bulgarische Weine
es: Vinos búlgaros
fr: Vins bulgares
hr: Vina iz bugarske
hu: Bolgár borok
nl: Bulgaarse wijnen, Bulgaarse wijn, Wijn uit Bulgarije

bg: Асеновград
en: Asenovgrad

en: Wines from Canada, Canadian Wines
hu: Kanadai borok
nl: Canadese wijnen, Canadese wij, Wijn uit Canada

en: Wines from Chile, Chilean Wines
de: Weine aus Chile
fr: Vin du Chili, Vin Chilien
hr: Vina iz čilea
hu: Chilei borok
nl: Chileense wijnen, Chileense wijn, Wijn uit Chili

en: Wines from Croatia, Croatian Wines
hu: Horvát borok
nl: Kroatische wijnen, Kroatische wijn, Wijn uit Kroatië

en: Wines from Cyprus, Cypriot wines
hu: Ciprusi borok
nl: Cypriotische wijnen

en: Commandaria
el: Κουμανδαρία

en: Wines from Czech Republic
fr: Vins de République tchèque
hr: Vina iz Češke
hu: Cseh borok
nl: Tsjechische wijnen, Tsjechische wijn

en: Wines from Georgia, Georgian wines
de: Weine aus Georgien
fr: Vins georgiens, vin géorgien, vins de Géorgie, vin de Géorgie
hr: Vina iz Gruzije
hu: Grúz borok
nl: Georgische wijnen, Georgische wijn

en: Wines from Germany, German wines
de: Weine aus Deutschland
fr: Vins allemands, vin allemand, vins d'Allemagne, vin d'Allemagne
hr: Vina iz njemačke
hu: Német borok
nl: Duitse wijnen, Duitse wijn